Louisiana, session 2026, SB362.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:1430 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1430. Unfair or deceptive trade practice or act; surveillance-based price
discrimination prohibited
A. For the purpose of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Automated decision system" means a system, software, or process
that uses computation, the result of which is used to assist or replace human
decision-making, including a system, software, or process derived from machine
learning, statistics, or other data processing or artificial intelligence techniques
and excludes passive computing infrastructure.
(2)"Behaviors" means an individual's observable, measurable, or
inferred actions, habits, preferences, interests, or vulnerabilities, including the
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-299 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 362
individual's political, personal, or professional affiliations, web browsing
history, IP addresses used, locations frequented, purchase history, financial
circumstances, consumer behaviors, or inferences associated with a group,
band, class, or tier of individuals in which the individual belongs.
(3) "Biometrics" means data or information generated by the
technological processing, measurement, or analysis of a consumer's biological,
physical, or behavioral characteristics, which data or information can be
processed for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual, including
fingerprints, voiceprints, scans, or records of an eye retina or iris, facial maps,
facial geometry, facial templates, genetic information, or other unique
biological, physical, or behavioral patterns or characteristics.
(4) "Consumer" means an individual who uses, purchases, or leases
goods or services.
(5) "Individualized" means specific to or inferred about an individual or
group, band, class, or tier of individuals with particular personal
characteristics, behaviors, or biometrics.
(6) "Insurer" means an insurer with a certificate of authority or license
issued under provisions pursuant to R.S. 22:481 et seq.
(7) "Personal characteristics" means individual qualities, features,
attributes or traits, including immutable characteristics such as race and eye
color, mutable characteristics such as address, weight, citizenship, or
parenthood status and any other personal identifying information that could be
used to uncover an individual's identity, including a social security number, full
name, or phone number.
(8) "Price" means the amount charged to a consumer in relation to a
transaction, including all related costs and fees and other material terms of the
transaction that have a direct bearing on the amount paid by the consumer or
the value of the good or service offered or provided to the consumer.
(9) "Surveillance data" means data obtained through observation,
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-299 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 362
inference, or surveillance of a consumer or worker that is related to personal
characteristics, behaviors, or biometrics of the individual or a group, band,
class, or tier in which the individual belongs, including information gathered,
purchased, or otherwise acquired.
B.(1) No person shall engage in surveillance-based price discrimination.
(2) A corporation or person shall not be deemed to have engaged in
surveillance-based price discrimination if the person demonstrates any of the
following:
(a) Differential prices are justified based on differences in cost in
providing a good or service to different consumers.
(b) Differential prices reflect discounts offered to all consumers on equal
terms in a manner consistent with applicable anti-discrimination laws, where
any of the following apply:
(i) The terms of the discount are available and accessible to consumers
and the public.
(ii) Discount reward membership uniformly applied to any consumer
who is a member in a particular group, including but not limited to active
members of the military, veterans, teachers, students, or senior citizens.
(iii) Any surveillance data used solely to offer or administer a discount
is not used for any other purpose, including profiling, targeted advertising, or
individualized price setting.
(iv) Eligibility for the discount is based on information affirmatively and
voluntarily provided by the consumer to the person offering the discount.
(v) Any loyalty program that allows a user to accrue and exchange
points, credits, or any similar nonmonetary system of value for a product or
service does not charge a different price for those points, credits, or similar
nonmonetary system of value to different consumers for the same or
substantially similar product or service.
(vi) The person operates as an insurer pursuant to R.S. 22:481 et seq.,
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-299 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 362
and applicable rules and only inputs risk-relevant data into an automated
decision system that informs decisions related to the amount a consumer shall
pay for an insurance policy or contract.
(3) An entity or person has not engaged in surveillance-based price
discrimination if the person can demonstrate that a refusal to extend credit at
specific terms or the refusal to enter into a transaction with a specific consumer
is based on data provided in a consumer report pursuant to the Fair Credit
Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.
C. A violation of this Section shall be a deceptive and unfair trade
practice and subject the violator to any action and penalty provided for in this
Chapter, including a private right of action as provided in R.S. 51:1409.